bg-BG: Процедура: Изследване на аневризма на коремната аорта; Управление на дихателните пътища; Артериален достъп; Вземане на проби от артериални кръвни газове; Артериална канюлация; Поставяне на артериална линия; Артроцентеза; Основни умения в откритата хирургия; Контрол на кървенето; Сонди за гърди; Канюлиране; Катастрофално събитие; Поставяне на централен венозен катетър; Централна съдова катетеризация; Поставяне на гръден дренаж; Поставяне на гръдна тръба; Изследване на общия жлъчен канал; Крикотиреоидотомия; Крикотиротомия; Диагностична перитонеална аспирация (ДПА); Диагностичен перитонеален лаваж (ДПЛ); Диагностичен ултразвук; Ехокардиограма; Епидурална упойка; Епизиотомия; Фокусирана оценка с ултразвук при травми; Поставяне на феморален венозен катетър; Ултразвуково изследване за чуждо тяло; Ултразвуково изследване на жлъчния мехур; Операция за херния; Венесекция; Боравене с инструменти; Поставяне на междуребрен дренаж; Интраосеално (IO) поставяне на игла; Интравенозен достъп; Интубация; Разкъсан бъбрек; Лапароскопска холецистектомия; Лапароскопска холецистентеростомия; Боравене с лапароскопски инструмент; Лапароскопската фундопликация по метода на Нисен; Лапароскопски умения; Лапароскопско шиене; Лапаротомия; Лумбална пункция; Декомпресия с игла; Нервна блокада; Нараняване на аортата; Нараняване на бъбречната артерия; Отворена холецистектомия; Отворена хирургия; Пейсмейкър; Парацентеза; Перикардиоцентеза; Перинеална репарация; Управление на болката, произтичаща от периферната нервна система; Периферно въведен централен катетър (PICC); Поставяне на плеврален дренаж; Лечение на пневмоторакс; Регионална анестезия; Ултразвуково изследване на бъбреците; Дясна сърдечна катетеризация; Хирургичен дихателен път; Шиене; Торакоцентеза; Поставяне на торакален катетър; Трахеостомия; Трансвенозно пейсиране; Торакостомия с тръба; Ултразвук; Ултразвуково ръководена катетеризация; Съдов достъп; Венозен достъп; Венозна канюлация; Разширена фокусирана оценка с ултразвук при травми; Друго
de: Verfahren: Untersuchung auf ein Bauchaortenaneurysma; Atemwegsmanagement; Arterieller Zugang; Arterielle Blutgasanalyse; Arterielle Kanülierung; Platzierung eines arteriellen Katheters; Arthrozentese; Operative Grundtechniken; Blutstillung; Brustsonde; Kanülierung; Katastropheneinsatz; Anlage eines zentralen Venenkatheters; Zentrale Gefäßkatheterisierung; Anlage einer Thoraxdrainage; Einsetzen einer Thoraxdrainage; Untersuchung des gemeinsamen Gallengangs; Koniotomie; Koniotomie; Diagnostische Peritonealpunktion (DPA); Diagnostische Peritoneallavage (DPL); Diagnostischer Ultraschall; Echokardiogramm; Epidural; Dammschnitt; FAST-Prüfung; Anlage eines Femoraliskatheters; Ultraschalluntersuchung mit Fremdkörper; Ultraschalluntersuchung der Gallenblase; Hernienreparatur; IV-Reduzierung; Instrumentenhandhabung; Einsetzen einer Interkostaldrainage; Intraossäre (IO) Nadeleinführung; Intravenöser Zugang; Intubation; Nierenriss; Laparoskopische Cholezystektomie; Laparoskopische Cholezystenterostomie; Laparoskopische Instrumentenhandhabung; Laparoskopische Nissen-Fundoplikatio; Laparoskopische Kompetenz; Laparoskopische Naht; Laparotomie; Lumbalpunktion; Nadeldekompression; Nervenblockade; Aortendissektion; Nierenarterienstenose; Offene Cholezystektomie; Offene Operation; Schrittmachergenerator; Parazentese; Perikardpunktion; Dammreparatur; Behandlung peripherer Schmerzen; Peripher eingeführter zentraler Venenkatheter (PICC); Einlage einer Pleuradrainage; Pneumothorax-Verfahren; Regionalanästhesie; Nierenultraschalluntersuchung; Rechtsherzkatheterisierung; Chirurgischer Atemweg; Nähen; Thorakozentese; Einsetzen eines Thoraxkatheters; Tracheostomie; Transvenöse Schrittmachertherapie; Thoraxdrainage; Ultraschall; Ultraschallgesteuerte Katheterisierung; Gefäßzugang; Venöser Zugang; Venenkanülierung; eFAST-Sonographie; Sonstiges
tr: Prosedür: Karın aort anevrizması muayenesi; Hava yolu yönetimi; Arteriyel erişim; Arteriyel kan gazı örneklemesi; Arteriyel kanülasyon; Arteriyel kateter yerleştirilmesi; Artrosentez; Temel açık cerrahi becerileri; Kanama kontrolü; Meme sondası; Kanülasyon; Katastrofik olay; Merkezi damar kateteri yerleştirilmesi; Merkezi vasküler kateterizasyon; Göğüs drenaj tüpü takılması; Göğüs tüpü yerleştirilmesi; Ortak safra kanalı incelemesi; Krikotiroidotomi; Krikotirotomi; Tanısal periton aspirasyonu (DPA); Tanısal periton lavajı (DPL); Tanısal ultrason; Ekokardiyogram; Epidural; Epizyotomi; FAST muayenesi; Femoral damar yolu açılması; Yabancı cisim ultrason muayenesi; Safra kesesi ultrason muayenesi; Fıtık onarımı; IV kesintisi; Enstrüman kullanımı; İnterkostal dren yerleştirme; İntraosseöz (IO) iğne yerleştirme; İntravenöz erişim; Entübasyon; Laserasyonlu böbrek; Laparoskopik kolesistektomi; Laparoskopik kolesistenterostomi; Laparoskopik enstrüman kullanımı; Laparoskopik Nissen; Laparoskopik beceriler; Laparoskopik sütür; Laparotomi; Lomber ponksiyon; İğne dekompresyonu; Sinir bloğu; Aortta kesi; Böbrek atardamarında kesi; Açık kolesistektomi; Açık cerrahi; Kalp pili jeneratörü; Parasentez; Perikardiyosentez; Perineal onarım; Çevresel ağrı yönetimi; Periferik olarak yerleştirilen santral kateter (PICC); Plevral dren yerleştirilmesi; Pnömotoraks uygulaması; Bölgesel anestezi; Böbrek ultrason muayenesi; Sağ kalp kateterizasyonu; Cerrahi hava yolu; Dikiş; Torasentez; Torasik kateter yerleştirme; Trakeostomi; Transvenöz kalp pili; Tüp torakostomi; Ultrason; Ultrason eşliğinde kateterizasyon; Vasküler erişim; Venöz erişim; Venöz kanülasyon; eFAST muayenesi; Diğer
hu: Eljárás: Hasi aorta aneurizma vizsgálata; Légútkezelés; Artériás hozzáférés; Artériás vérgáz mintavétele; Artériás kanülálás; Artériás katéter behelyezése; Ízületi punkció; Alapvető nyitott sebészeti ismeretek; Vérzéscsillapítás; Mellszonda; Kanülálás; Katasztrofális esemény; Központi katéter behelyezése; Központi érkatéterezés; Mellkasi drén behelyezése; Mellkasi cső behelyezése; Közös epevezeték feltárása; Krikotireoidotómia; Krikotireotómia; Diagnosztikai peritoneális aspiráció (DPA); Diagnosztikai hashártyaöblítés (DPL); Diagnosztikai ultrahang; Echokardiográfia; Epidurális; Gátmetszés; FAST-vizsgálat; Femoralis katéter behelyezése; Idegentest-ultrahangvizsgálat; Epehólyag-ultrahangvizsgálat; Sérvjavítás; IV-csökkentés; Műszeres kezelés; Bordaközi drén behelyezése; Intraosseális (IO) tű behelyezése; Intravénás hozzáférés; Intubáció; Szétszakadt vese; Laparoszkópos epehólyag-eltávolítás; Laparoszkópos kolecisztenterosztómia; Laparoszkópos műszeres kezelés; Laparoszkópos Nissen; Laparoszkópos képesség; Laparoszkópos varrás; Laparotomia; Ágyéki punkció; Tűdekompresszió; Idegblokk; Bevágott aorta; Bevágott veseartéria; Nyílt kolecisztektómia; Nyílt műtét; Pacemaker generátor; Paracentézis; Perikardiocentézis; Gátjavítás; Perifériás fájdalomcsillapítás; Perifériásan behelyezett centrális katéter (PICC); Pleurális drén behelyezése; Pneumothorax kezelése; Regionális érzéstelenítés; Vese-ultrahangvizsgálat; Jobb szív katéterezése; Sebészeti légút; Varrás; Thoracentézis; Mellkasi katéter behelyezése; Tracheostomia; Transzvénás pacemaker; Csős mellkasi műtét; Ultrahang; Ultrahangvezérelt katéterezés; Érrendszeri hozzáférés; Vénás hozzáférés; Vénás kanülálás; eFAST-vizsgálat; Egyéb
nl: Ingreep: Onderzoek naar abdominaal aorta-aneurysma; Luchtwegmanagement; Arteriële toegang; Arteriële bloedgasanalyse; Arteriële canulatie; Plaatsing van een arteriële lijn; Arthrocentese; Basisvaardigheden in de open chirurgie; Bloedingscontrole; Borst-echografie; Canulatie; Catastrofale gebeurtenis; Inbrengen van een centraal veneuze katheter; Centrale vasculaire katheterisatie; Inbrengen van een thoraxdrain; Inbrengen van een thoraxdrain; Choledochusexploratie; Coniotomie; Cricothyrotomie; Diagnostische peritoneale aspiratie (DPA); Diagnostische peritoneale lavage (DPL); Diagnostische echografie; Echocardiogram; Epidurale anesthesie; Episiotomie; FAST-onderzoek; Inbrengen van een femorale katheter; Echografie voor detectie van een vreemd lichaam; Echografie van de galblaas; Herniaoperatie; Chirurgische veneuze toegang (cutdown); Omgang met instrumentarium; Plaatsen van een thoraxdrain; Inbrengen van een intraossale naald; Vaattoegang; Intubatie; Nierlaceratie; Laparoscopische galblaasverwijdering; Laparoscopische cholecystectomie; Omgang met laparoscopisch instrumentarium; Laparoscopische Nissen-fundoplicatie; Laparoscopische vaardigheden; Laparoscopische hechting; Laparotomie; Lumbale punctie; Naalddecompressie; Zenuwblokkade; Beschadigde aorta; Beschadigde nierslagader; Open cholecystectomie; Open chirurgie; Pacemakergenerator; Ascitespunctie; Pericardpunctie; Perineumhechting; Perifere pijnbestrijding; Perifeer ingebrachte centrale katheter (PICC-lijn); Plaatsen van een pleuradrain; Behandeling van pneumothorax; Regionale anesthesie; Echografie van de nieren; Rechtshartkatheterisatie; Chirurgische luchtweg; Hechten; Pleurapunctie; Plaatsen van een thoraxkatheter; Tracheostomie; Transveneuze pacemakerstimulatie; Thoraxdrainage; Echo; Echogeleide katheterisatie; Vasculaire toegang; Vaattoegang; Veneuze canulatie; eFast-onderzoek; Overig
hr-HR: Postupak: Pregled aneurizme abdominalne aorte; Zbrinjavanje dišnog puta; Arterijski pristup; Uzorkovanje plina u arterijskoj krvi; Arterijska kanulacija; Postavljanje arterijske linije; Artrocenteza; Osnovne kirurške vještine; Kontrola krvarenja; Sonda za dojke; Kanulacija; Katastrofalni događaj; Postavljanje središnje linije; Centralna vaskularna kateterizacija; Umetanje torakalnog drena; Umetanje torakalnog drena; Eksploracija glavnog žučovoda; Krikotireoidotomija; Krikotireotomija; Dijagnostička peritonealna aspiracija (DPA); Dijagnostičko peritonealno ispiranje (DPL); Dijagnostički ultrazvuk; Ehokardiogram; Epiduralna anestezija; Epiziotomija; Pregled FAST; Postavljanje femoralne linije; Ultrazvučni pregled stranog tijela; Ultrazvučni pregled žučnog mjehura; Reparacija kile; Otvaranje vene; Rukovanje instrumentima; Umetanje interkostalnog drena; Intraosealno umetanje igle; Intravenski pristup; Intubacija; Laceracija bubrega; Laparoskopska kolecistektomija; Laparoskopska kolecistenterostomija; Rukovanje laparoskopskim instrumentima; Laparoskopska nissen fundoplikacija; Laparoskopske vještine; Laparoskopsko šivanje; Laparotomija; Lumbalna punkcija; Dekompresija iglom; Blokiranje živaca; Oštećena aorta; Oštećena bubrežna arterija; Otvorena kolecistektomija; Otvorena operacija; Generator pulsa; Paracenteza; Perikardiocenteza; Reparacija perineuma; Liječenje periferne boli; Periferno uvedeni centralni venski kateter (PICC); Umetanje pleuralnog drena; Liječenje pneumotoraksa; Regionalna anestezija; Ultrazvučni pregled bubrega; Kateterizacija desne strane srca; Kirurško uspostavljanje dišnog puta; Šivanje; Toracenteza; Umetanje torakalnog katetera; Traheostomija; Transvenska stimulacija; Cijevna torakostomija; Ultrazvuk; Ultrazvučno vođena kateterizacija; Vaskularni pristup; Venski pristup; Venska kanulacija; Pregled eFAST; Ostalo
pt-PT: Procedimento: Exame de aneurisma da aorta abdominal; Manuseamento da via aérea; Acesso arterial; Colheita de gases do sangue arterial; Canulação arterial; Colocação de cateter arterial; Artrocentese; Competências básicas em cirurgia aberta; Controlo de hemorragia; Sonda mamária; Canulação; Evento catastrófico; Colocação de cateter central; Cateterização vascular central; Inserção de dreno torácico; Inserção de tubo torácico; Exploração do ducto biliar comum; Cricotireotomia; Cricotireotomia; Aspiração peritoneal diagnóstica (APD); Lavado peritoneal diagnóstico (LPD); Ultrassom diagnóstico; Ecocardiograma; Epidural; Episiotomia; Exame FAST; colocação de cateter femoral; Exame de ultrassom para corpo estranho; Exame ecográfico da vesícula biliar; Reparo de hérnia; Acesso venoso através de incisão da veia; Manuseamento de instrumentos; Inserção de dreno intercostal; Inserção de agulha intraóssea (IO); Acesso intravenoso; Intubação; Rim lacerado; Colecistectomia laparoscópica; Colecistectomia laparoscópica; Manuseamento de instrumentos laparoscópicos; Fundoplicatura de Nissen laparoscópica; Competências laparoscópicas; Suturas laparoscópicas; Laparotomia; Punção lombar; Descompressão por agulha; Bloqueio nervoso; Aorta lesionada; Artéria renal lesionada; Colecistectomia aberta; Cirurgia aberta; Gerador de pacemaker; Paracentese; Pericardiocentese; Reparação perineal; Gestão da dor periférica; Cateter central de inserção periférica (PICC); Inserção de dreno pleural; Tratamento do pneumotórax; Anestesia regional; Exame de ultrassom renal; Cateterismo do coração direito; Via aérea cirúrgica; Sutura; Toracocentese; Inserção de cateter torácico; Traqueostomia; Estimulação transvenosa; Toracostomia com drenagem; Ultrassom; Cateterização guiada por ultrassons; Acesso vascular; Acesso venoso; Canulação venosa; exame eFAST; Outro
lt-LT: Procedūra: Pilvo aortos aneurizmos tyrimas; Kvėpavimo takų valdymas; Arterinis priėjimas; Arterinio kraujo dujų mėginių ėmimas; Arterinė kaniuliacija; Arterinė linija rodymo vieta; Artrocentezė; Pagrindiniai atviros chirurgijos įgūdžiai; Kraujavimo kontrolė; Krūtų zondas; Kanuliacija; Katastrofiškas įvykis; Centrinės venos kateterizavimas; Centrinė kraujagyslių kateterizacija; Krūtinės drenavimas; Krūtinės ląstos vamzdelio įdėjimas; Bendrojo tulžies latako tyrimas; Krikotiroidotomija; Krikotirotomija; Diagnostinė peritoninė aspiracija (DPA); Diagnostinis pilvaplėvės ertmės plovimas (DPL); Diagnostinis ultragarsas; Echokardiograma; Epidurinė nejautra; Epiziotomija; FAST egzaminas; Šlaunies venos kateterizavimas; Svetimkūnio ultragarsinis tyrimas; Tulžies pūslės ultragarsinis tyrimas; Išvaržos atstatymas; IV sumažinimas; Instrumentų tvarkymas; Tarpšonkaulinių drenų įvedimas; Intrakaulinis (IO) adatos įdėjimas; Intraveninė prieiga; Intubacija; Plėšytas inkstas; Laparoskopinė cholecistektomija; Laparoskopinė cholecistenterostomija; Laparoskopinių instrumentų tvarkymas; Laparoskopinis nišimas; Laparoskopiniai įgūdžiai; Laparoskopinis siuvimas; Laparotomija; Juosmens punkcija; Adatos dekompresija; Nervų blokada; Įskilusi aorta; Įskilusi inkstų arterija; Atvira cholecistektomija; Atvira chirurgija; Širdies stimuliavimo generatorius; Paracentezė; Perikardiocentezė; Tarpvietės atstatymas; Periferinio skausmo valdymas; Periferiniu būdu įvestas centrinis kateteris (PICC); Pleuros drenažo įdėjimas; Pneumotorakso testavimo variantas; Regioninė anestezija; Inkstų ultragarsinis tyrimas; Dešinės širdies kateterizacija; Chirurginis kvėpavimo takas; Siuvimas; Toracentezė; Krūtinės ląstos kateterio įvedimas; Tracheostomija; Transveninis stimuliavimas; Vamzdinė torakostomija; Ultragarsas; Ultragarsu valdoma kateterizacija; Kraujagyslių prieiga; Veninė prieiga; Veninė kaniuliacija; eFAST egzaminas; Kita
es: Procedimiento: Examen para detectar un aneurisma aórtico abdominal; Manejo de vía respiratoria; Acceso arterial; Muestreo de gasometría arterial; Canulación arterial; Colocación de línea arterial; Artrocentesis; Habilidades básicas para cirugía abierta; Control del sangrado; Sonda mamaria; Canulación; Catástrofe; Colocación de línea central; Cateterismo vascular central; Inserción de drenaje torácico; Inserción de tubo torácico; Exploración del conducto biliar común; Cricotirotomía; Cricotirotomía; Aspiración peritoneal de diagnóstico (DPA); Lavado peritoneal de diagnóstico (DPL); Ecografía de diagnóstico; Ecocardiograma; Epidural; Episiotomía; Examen de Evaluación focalizada con sonografía para trauma (FAST); Colocación de línea femoral; Estudio ecográfico de cuerpos extraños; Estudio ecográfico de la vesícula biliar; Reparación de hernia; Incisión Venosa; Manejo del instrumental; Inserción de drenaje intercostal; Inserción de aguja intraósea (IO); Acceso intravenoso; Intubación; Riñón lacerado; Colecistectomía laparoscópica; Colecistenterostomía laparoscópica; Manejo del instrumental laparoscópico; Nissen laparoscópico; Habilidades laparoscópicas; Sutura laparoscópica; Laparotomía; Punción lumbar; Descompresión con aguja; Bloqueo de nervios; Desgarro de aorta; Desgarro de arteria renal; Colecistectomía abierta; Cirugía abierta; Generador de marcapasos; Paracentesis; Pericardiocentesis; Reparación perineal; Manejo del dolor periférico; Catéter central de inserción periférica (PICC); Inserción de drenaje pleural; Tratamiento del neumotórax; Anestesia regional; Estudio ecográfico renal; Cateterismo cardíaco derecho; Vía aérea quirúrgica; Sutura; Toracocentesis; Inserción de catéter torácico; Traqueotomía; Marcapasos transvenoso; Toracostomía con tubo; Ecografía; Cateterismo guiado por ecografía; Acceso vascular; Acceso venoso; Canulación venosa; Examen de Evaluación focalizada extendida con sonografía para trauma (FAST); Otros
en: Procedure: Abdominal aorta aneurysm exam; Airway management; Arterial access; Arterial blood gas sampling; Arterial cannulation; Arterial line placement; Arthrocentesis; Basic open surgical skills; Bleeding control; Breast probe; Cannulation; Catastrophic event; Central line placement; Central vascular catheterization; Chest drain insertion; Chest tube insertion; Common bile duct exploration; Cricothyroidotomy; Cricothyrotomy; Diagnostic peritoneal aspiration (DPA); Diagnostic peritoneal lavage (DPL); Diagnostic ultrasound; Echocardiogram; Epidural; Episiotomy; FAST exam; Femoral line placement; Foreign body ultrasound exam; Gall bladder ultrasound exam; Hernia repair; IV cutdown; Instrument handling; Intercostal drain insertion; Intraosseous (IO) needle insertion; Intravenous access; Intubation; Lacerated kidney; Laparoscopic cholecystectomy; Laparoscopic cholecystenterostomy; Laparoscopic instrument handling; Laparoscopic nissen; Laparoscopic skills; Laparoscopic suturing; Laparotomy; Lumbar puncture; Needle decompression; Nerve block; Nicked aorta; Nicked renal artery; Open cholecystectomy; Open surgery; Pacing generator; Paracentesis; Pericardiocentesis; Perineal repair; Peripheral pain management; Peripherally inserted central catheter (PICC); Pleural drain insertion; Pneumothorax treatment; Regional anesthesia; Renal ultrasound exam; Right heart catheterization; Surgical airway; Suturing; Thoracentesis; Thoracic catheter insertion; Tracheostomy; Transvenous pacing; Tube thoracostomy; Ultrasound; Ultrasound guided catheterization; Vascular access; Venous access; Venous cannulation; eFAST exam; Other
sv: Procedur: Undersökning av bukaortaaneurysm; Luftvägshantering; Artäråtkomst; Arteriell blodgasprovtagning; Arteriell kanylering; Placering av arteriell linje; Artrocentes; Basic Shopify öppen kirurgisk kompetens; Blödningskontroll; Bröstsond; Kanylering; Katastrofal händelse; Placering av central venkateter; Central vaskulär kateterisering; Insättning av bröstdränage; Insättning av thoraxslang; Utforskning av den gemensamma gallgången; Krikotyreotomi; Krikotyrotomi; Diagnostisk peritoneal aspiration (DPA); Diagnostisk peritoneal lavage (DPL); Diagnostisk ultraljud; Ekokardiogram; Epidural; Episiotomi; FAST-examen; Placering av femoralislinje; Ultraljudsundersökning av främmande kropp; Ultraljudsundersökning av gallblåsan; Bråckreparation; IV-nedskärning; Instrumenthantering; Insättning av interkostal dränage; Intraossös (IO) nålinsättning; Intravenös åtkomst; Intubation; Sliten njure; Laparoskopisk kolecystektomi; Laparoskopisk kolecystenterostomi; Laparoskopisk instrumenthantering; Laparoskopisk nissen; Laparoskopisk kompetens; Laparoskopisk suturering; Laparotomi; Lumbalpunktion; Nåldekompression; Nervblock; Nickad aorta; Nickad njurartär; Öppen kolecystektomi; Öppen kirurgi; Pacinggenerator; Paracentes; Perikardiocentes; Perineal reparation; Perifer smärtbehandling; Perifert insatt central kateter (PICC); Pleuradränageinsättning; Behandling av pneumothorax; Regionalbedövning; Ultraljudsundersökning av njurarna; kateterisering av höger hjärthalva; Kirurgisk luftväg; Suturering; Thoracentes; Insättning av thoraxkateter; Trakeostomi; Transvenös pacing; Torakostomi; Ultraljud; Ultraljudsledd kateterisering; Kärlåtkomst; Venös åtkomst; Venös kanylering; eFAST-undersökning; Övrigt
zh-CN: 手术操作: 腹主动脉瘤检查; 气道管理; 动脉通路建立; 动脉血气采样; 动脉插管; 动脉导管置入; 关节穿刺术; 基础的开放性手术技能; 止血操作; 乳腺探头检查; 导管置入; 灾难性事件处理; 中心静脉置管; 中心血管导管置入; 胸腔引流管插入术; 胸管插入术; 胆总管探查术; 环甲膜切开术; 紧急气道建立; 诊断性腹腔穿刺术 (DPA); 诊断性腹腔灌洗术 (DPL); 诊断性超声检查; 超声心动图; 硬膜外麻醉; 会阴切开术; FAST 检查; 股静脉置管; 异物超声检查; 胆囊超声检查; 疝修补术; 静脉切开术; 器械操作; 肋间引流管插入术; 骨髓穿刺置针术; 外周静脉通路建立; 气管插管; 肾破裂处理; 腹腔镜胆囊切除术; 腹腔镜胆囊肠吻合术; 腹腔镜器械操作; 腹腔镜胃底折叠术; 腹腔镜手术技能; 腹腔镜缝合术; 开腹术; 腰椎穿刺; 针刺减压; 神经阻滞; 主动脉轻微损伤处理; 肾动脉轻微损伤处理; 开放性胆囊切除术; 开放性手术; 起搏器植入; 腹腔穿刺术; 心包穿刺术; 会阴修复术; 外周疼痛管理; 经外周静脉穿刺中心静脉置管 (PICC); 胸膜引流管插入术; 气胸处理; 区域麻醉; 肾脏超声检查; 右心导管检查; 外科气道建立; 缝合; 胸腔穿刺术; 胸腔导管插入术; 气管造口术; 经静脉起搏; 胸腔造口置管术; 超声检查; 超声引导下导管置入; 血管通路建立; 静脉通路建立; 静脉插管术; eFAST 检查; 其他
cs: Postup: Vyšetření aneurysmatu břišní aorty; Zajištění dýchacích cest; Arteriální přístup; Odběr vzorků krevních plynů; Arteriální kanylace; Zavedení arteriální kanyly; Arthrocentéza; Základní dovednosti v oblasti otevřené chirurgie; Zastavení krvácení; Prsní sonda; Kanylace; Katastrofická událost; Zavedení centrálního žilního katetru; Centrální cévní katetrizace; Zvedení hrudního drénu; Zavedení hrudní trubice; Vyšetření společného žlučovodu; Koniotomie; Krikothyroidotomie; Diagnostická peritoneální aspirace (DPA); Diagnostická peritoneální laváž (DPL); Diagnostický ultrazvuk; Echokardiogram; Epidural; Epiziotomie; Vyšetření FAST; Zavedení femorálního katetru; Ultrazvukové vyšetření cizího tělesa; Ultrazvukové vyšetření žlučníku; Operace kýly; Intravenózní přístup; Manipulace s nástroji; Zavedení mezižeberní drenáže; Zavedení intraoseální (IO) jehly; Intravenózní přístup; Intubace; Ledvina s natržením; Laparoskopická cholecystektomie; Laparoskopická cholecystenterostomie; Manipulace s laparoskopickými nástroji; Laparoskopická Nissenova fundoplikace; Laparoskopické dovednosti; Laparoskopické šití; Laparotomie; Lumbální punkce; Dekomprese jehlou; Nervový blok; Poškozená aorta; Poškozená ledvinná tepna; Otevřená cholecystektomie; Otevřená operace; Kardiostimulační generátor; Paracentéza; Perikardiocentéza; Perineoplastika; Řízení periferní bolesti; Periferně zavedený centrální katetr (PICC); Zavedení pleurální drenáže; Léčba pneumotoraxu; Regionální anestezie; Ultrazvukové vyšetření ledvin; Katetrizace pravé srdeční komory; Chirurgické zajištění dýchacích cest; Šití; Torakocentéza; Zavedení hrudního katetru; Tracheostomie; Transvenózní kardiostimulace; Thorakostomie s drénem; Ultrazvuk; Katetrizace pod ultrazvukovou kontrolou; Cévní přístup; Žilní přístup; Žilní kanylace; Vyšetření eFAST; Jiné
pl: Procedura medyczna: Badanie tętniaka aorty brzusznej; Udrożnianie dróg oddechowych; Dostęp tętniczy; Pobieranie próbek gazometrii krwi tętniczej; Kaniulacja tętnicy; Cewnikowanie tętnicy; Punkcja stawu; Podstawowe umiejętności w zakresie chirurgii otwartej; Kontrola krwawienia; Sonda do badania piersi; Kaniulacja; Zdarzenie katastrofalne; Wkłucie centralne; Dojście centralne do żyły; Wprowadzenie drenu do klatki piersiowej; Wprowadzenie rurki do klatki piersiowej; Eksploracja przewodu żółciowego wspólnego; Konikotomia; Konikotomia; Diagnostyczne nakłucie otrzewnej; Diagnostyczne płukanie otrzewnej; Ultrasonografia diagnostyczna; Echokardiogram; Znieczulenie zewnątrzoponowe; Nacięcie krocza; Badanie FAST; Wkłucie do żyły udowej; Badanie ultrasonograficzne w wykrywaniu ciał obcych; Badanie ultrasonograficzne pęcherzyka żółciowego; Plastyka przepukliny; Chirurgiczne odsłonięcie żyły; Obsługa instrumentów; Założenie drenu międzyżebrowego; Wkłucie doszpikowe; Dostęp dożylny; Intubacja; Urazowe rozerwanie nerki; Laparoskopowe usunięcie pęcherzyka żółciowego; Laparoskopowa cholecystenterostomia; Obsługa narzędzi laparoskopowych; Laparoskopowa fundoplikacja metodą Nissena; Umiejętności w zakresie laparoskopii; Szycie laparoskopowe; Laparotomia; Nakłucie lędźwiowe; Odbarczenie odmy prężnej; Blokada nerwu; Uszkodzenie aorty; Uszkodzenie tętnicy nerkowej; Cholecystektomia otwarta; Operacja otwarta; Rozrusznik serca; Paracenteza; Perikardiocenteza; Plastyka krocza; Leczenie bólu obwodowego; Cewnik centralny wprowadzany obwodowo (PICC); Założenie drenu opłucnowego; Leczenie odmy opłucnowej; Znieczulenie regionalne; USG nerek; Cewnikowanie prawostronne serca; Chirurgiczne udrożnienie dróg oddechowych; Szycie chirurgiczne; Torakocenteza; Drenaż klatki piersiowej; Tracheostomia; Stymulacja przezżylna; Drenaż klatki piersiowej; Ultrasonografia; Cewnikowanie pod kontrolą USG; Dostęp naczyniowy; Dostęp żylny; Kaniulacja żył; Badanie eFAST; Inne
it: Procedura: Esame dell'aneurisma dell'aorta addominale; Gestione delle vie aeree; Accesso arterioso; Campionamento dei gas nel sangue arterioso; Cannulazione arteriosa; Posizionamento della linea arteriosa; Artrocentesi; Competenze chirurgiche di base a cielo aperto; Controllo delle emorragie; Sonda mammaria; Cannulazione; Evento catastrofico; Posizionamento della linea centrale; Cateterizzazione vascolare centrale; Inserimento del drenaggio toracico; Inserimento del tubo toracico; Esplorazione del dotto biliare comune; Cricotiroidotomia; Cricotirotomia; Aspirazione peritoneale diagnostica (DPA); Lavaggio peritoneale diagnostico (DPL); Ecografia diagnostica; Ecocardiogramma; Epidurale; Episiotomia; Esame FAST; Posizionamento della linea femorale; Esame ecografico per corpi estranei; Esame ecografico della cistifellea; Riparazione dell'ernia; Taglio IV; Gestione degli strumenti; Inserimento del drenaggio intercostale; Inserimento dell'ago intraosseo (IO); Accesso endovenoso; Intubazione; Rene lacerato; Colecistectomia laparoscopica; Colecistenterostomia laparoscopica; Gestione strumenti laparoscopici; Nissen laparoscopico; Abilità laparoscopica; Sutura laparoscopica; Laparotomia; Puntura lombare; Decompressione con ago; Blocco nervoso; Aorta intaccata; Arteria renale intaccata; Colecistectomia aperta; Chirurgia aperta; Generatore di stimolazione; Paracentesi; Pericardiocentesi; Riparazione perineale; Gestione del dolore periferico; Catetere centrale inserito perifericamente (PICC); Inserimento del drenaggio pleurico; Variante di pneumotorace; Anestesia regionale; Esame ecografico renale; Cateterizzazione del cuore destro; Vie aeree chirurgiche; Sutura; Toracentesi; Inserimento del catetere toracico; Tracheostomia; Stimolazione transvenosa; Toracostomia con tubo; Ultrasuoni; Cateterizzazione ecoguidata; Accesso vascolare; Accesso venoso; Cannulazione venosa; Esame eFAST; Altro
nb: Prosedyre: Undersøkelse av aneurisme i abdominal aorta; Luftveishåndtering; Arteriell tilgang; Arteriell blodgassprøvetaking; Arteriell kanylering; Arteriell linjeplassering; Artrocentese; Grunnleggende ferdigheter i åpen kirurgi; Blødningskontroll; Brystsonde; Kanylering; Katastrofal hendelse; Plassering av sentrallinje; Sentral vaskulær kateterisering; Innsetting av brystdren; Innsetting av brystrør; Utforskning av felles gallegang; Krikotyreotomi; Krikotyrotomi; Diagnostisk peritoneal aspirasjon (DPA); Diagnostisk peritoneal lavage (DPL); Diagnostisk ultralyd; Ekkokardiogram; Epidural; Episiotomi; FAST-undersøkelse; Plassering av lårbenslinje; Ultralydundersøkelse av fremmedlegeme; Ultralydundersøkelse av galleblæren; Brokkreparasjon; IV-nedskjæring; Instrument-ekspedering; Interkostal dreninnsetting; Intraossøs (IO) nåleinnsetting; Intravenøs tilgang; Intubasjon; Nyrelaserasjon; Laparoskopisk kolecystektomi; Laparoskopisk kolecystenterostomi; Laparoskopisk instrumentekspedering; Laparoskopisk Nissen‑fundoplikasjon; Laparoskopiske ferdigheter; Laparoskopisk suturering; Laparotomi; Lumbalpunksjon; Nåldekompresjon; Nerveblokk; Aortalaserasjon; Renal arterielaserasjon; Åpen kolecystektomi; Åpen kirurgi; Pacinggenerator; Paracentese; Perikardiocentese; Reparasjon av perinealområdet; Perifer smertebehandling; Perifert innsatt sentralkateter (PICC); Innlegging av pleuradren; Pneumothorax-behandling; Regionalbedøvelse; Ultralydundersøkelse av nyrer; Høyresidig hjertekateterisering; Kirurgisk luftvei; Suturering; Thoracentese; Innlegging av thoraxkateter; Trakeostomi; Transvenøs pacing; Rørthorakostomi; Ultralyd; Kateterisering veiledet av ultralyd; Vaskulær tilgang; Venøs tilgang; Venøs kanylering; eFAST-undersøkelse; Annet
vi: Thủ thuật: Khám phình động mạch chủ bụng; Quản lý đường thở; Đặt đường động mạch; Lấy khí máu động mạch; Đặt ống thông động mạch; Đặt đường truyền động mạch; Chọc hút dịch khớp; Kỹ năng phẫu thuật mở cơ bản; Kiểm soát chảy máu; Đầu dò siêu âm vú; Đặt ống thông; Sự kiện thảm khốc; Đặt đường truyền tĩnh mạch trung tâm; Đặt catheter mạch máu trung tâm; Đặt ống dẫn lưu màng phổi; Đặt ống dẫn lưu ngực; Thăm dò ống mật chủ; Mở khí quản qua màng giáp – nhẫn; Mở khí quản qua màng giáp – nhẫn; Chọc hút chẩn đoán ổ bụng (DPA); Rửa ổ bụng chẩn đoán (DPL); Siêu âm chẩn đoán; Siêu âm tim; Gây tê ngoài màng cứng; Rạch tầng sinh môn; Siêu âm FAST; Đặt đường truyền tĩnh mạch đùi; Siêu âm dị vật; Siêu âm túi mật; Phẫu thuật sửa chữa thoát vị; Mở tĩnh mạch (IV cutdown); Thao tác dụng cụ; Đặt dẫn lưu khoang liên sườn; Đặt kim trong xương (IO); Đường truyền tĩnh mạch; Đặt nội khí quản; Thận bị rách; Phẫu thuật cắt túi mật nội soi; Nối túi mật – ruột bằng nội soi; Thao tác dụng cụ nội soi; Thủ thuật Nissen nội soi; Kỹ năng nội soi; Khâu nội soi; Phẫu thuật mở bụng; Chọc dò thắt lưng; Giải áp bằng kim; Phong bế thần kinh; Rách nhẹ động mạch chủ; Rách nhẹ động mạch thận; Cắt túi mật mở; Phẫu thuật mở; Máy tạo nhịp; Chọc dò ổ bụng; Chọc dò màng ngoài tim; Khâu sửa tầng sinh môn; Kiểm soát đau ngoại vi; Ống thông tĩnh mạch trung tâm đặt qua đường ngoại vi (PICC); Đặt dẫn lưu màng phổi; Điều trị tràn khí màng phổi; Gây tê vùng; Siêu âm thận; Đặt catheter tim phải; Mở khí quản phẫu thuật; Khâu; Chọc dò màng phổi; Đặt catheter lồng ngực; Mở khí quản; Tạo nhịp qua tĩnh mạch; Đặt ống dẫn lưu lồng ngực; Siêu âm; Đặt catheter dưới hướng dẫn siêu âm; Đường vào mạch máu; Đường vào tĩnh mạch; Đặt ống thông tĩnh mạch; Siêu âm eFAST; Khác
fr: Procédure: Examen d’un anévrisme de l’aorte abdominale; Gestion des voies respiratoires; Accès artériel; Prélèvement des gaz du sang dans les artères; Canulation de l’artère; Pose d’un cathéter artériel; Arthrocentèse; Techniques chirurgicales de base; Contrôle des saignements; Sonde mammaire; Canulation; Gestion d’événements catastrophiques; Pose de cathéter central; Cathétérisme vasculaire central; Pose de drain thoracique; Pose d’un drain thoracique; Exploration du canal cholédoque; Cricothyroïdotomie; Cricothyrotomie; Aspiration péritonéale diagnostique (APD); Lavage péritonéal diagnostique (LPD); Échographie diagnostique; Échocardiogramme; Péridurale; Épisiotomie; Examen FAST; Pose de voie fémorale; Examen échographique de corps étranger; Examen échographique de la vésicule biliaire; Réparation d’une hernie; Incision IV; Manipulation d’instruments; Pose d’un drain intercostal; Insertion d’aiguille intra-osseuse (IO); Accès intraveineux; Intubation; Rein lacéré; Cholécystectomie laparoscopique; Cholécystentérostomie laparoscopique; Manipulation d’instruments laparoscopiques; Laparoscopie Nissen; Compétences laparoscopiques; Suture laparoscopique; Laparotomie; Ponction lombaire; Décompression à l’aiguille; Bloc nerveux; Aorte incisée; Artère rénale incisée; Cholécystectomie ouverte; Chirurgie ouverte; Générateur de stimulation cardiaque; Paracentèse; Péricardiocentèse; Réparation périnéale; Gestion de la douleur périphérique; Cathéter central inséré par voie périphérique (PICC); Pose d’un drain pleural; Traitement du pneumothorax; Anesthésie régionale; Examen échographique rénal; Cathétérisme du cœur droit; Voie aérienne chirurgicale; Suture; Thoracentèse; Pose d’un cathéter thoracique; Trachéotomie; Stimulation transveineuse; Thoracostomie tubulaire; Échographie; Cathétérisme guidé par échographie; Accès vasculaire; Accès veineux; Canulation veineuse; Examen eFAST; Autre
ko: 시술: 복부 대동맥류 검사; 기도 관리; 동맥 접근; 동맥혈 가스 채혈; 동맥 캐뉼레이션; 동맥 라인 삽입; 관절 천자; 기본 개복 수술 술기; 출혈 조절; 유방 프로브; 캐뉼레이션; 재난적 사건; 중심정맥관 삽입; 중심 혈관 카테터 삽입; 흉관 삽입; 흉관 삽입; 총담관 탐색; 윤상갑상막 절개술; 윤상갑상막 절개술; 진단적 복강 천자(DPA); 진단적 복강 세척술(DPL); 진단 초음파; 심장초음파; 경막외 마취; 회음 절개술; FAST 검사; 대퇴정맥관 삽입; 이물질 초음파 검사; 담낭 초음파 검사; 탈장 수술; 정맥 절개술; 기구 조작; 늑간 배액관 삽입; 골내(IO) 바늘 삽입; 정맥 접근; 기관 삽관; 신장 열상; 복강경 담낭 절제술; 복강경 담낭 장문합술; 복강경 기구 조작; 복강경 니센 수술; 복강경 술기; 복강경 봉합; 개복술; 요추천자; 바늘 감압술; 신경 차단; 대동맥 손상; 신동맥 손상; 개복 담낭 절제술; 개복 수술; 심박 조율기 발생기; 복수 천자; 심낭 천자; 회음부 봉합; 말초 통증 관리; 말초 삽입 중심 정맥 카테터(PICC); 흉막 배액관 삽입; 기흉 처리; 국소 마취; 신장 초음파 검사; 우심 카테터 삽입; 외과적 기도 확보; 봉합; 흉강천자; 흉부 카테터 삽입; 기관절개술; 경정맥 심박 조율; 흉관 삽입술; 초음파; 초음파 유도 카테터 입술; 혈관 접근; 정맥 접근; 정맥 캐뉼레이션; eFAST 검사; 기타
sl-SI: Postopek: Pregled anevrizme trebušne aorte; Obvladovanje dihalnih poti; Dostop do arterije; Vzorčenje plinov v arterijski krvi; Arterijska kanulacija; Postavitev arterijskega voda; Artrocenteza; Osnovne veščine odprte kirurgije; Zaustavitev krvavitve; Sonda za dojke; Kanilacija; Katastrofalen dogodek; Postavitev glavnega voda; Centralna žilna kateterizacija; Vstavitev drenaže v prsni koš; Vstavitev prsnega cevja; Pregled skupnega žolčevoda; Konikotomija; Krikotirotomija; Diagnostična peritonealna aspiracija (DPA); Diagnostična peritonealna lavaža (DPL); Diagnostični ultrazvok; Ehokardiogram; Epiduralno; Epiziotomija; Test FAST; Postavitev femoralnega voda; Ultrazvočni pregled za tujke; Ultrazvočni pregled žolčnika; Reparacija hernije; Operacija krčnih žil; Ravnanje z instrumenti; Vstavitev medrebrnega drena; Vstavitev intraosalne igle (IO); Intravenski dostop; Intubacija; Raztrgana ledvica; Laparoskopska holecistektomija; Laparoskopska holecistenterostomija; Ravnanje z laparoskopskimi instrumenti; Laparoskopski poseg po Nissenu; Laparoskopske spretnosti; Laparoskopsko šivanje; Laparotomija; Lumbalna punkcija; Dekompresija z iglo; Blokada živca; Zarezana aorta; Zarezana ledvična arterija; Odprta holecistektomija; Odprta operacija; Generator spodbujevalnika; Paracenteza; Perikardiocenteza; Reparacija presredka; Obvladovanje perifernih bolečin; Periferno vstavljen centralni kateter (PICC); Vstavitev plevralne drenaže; Zdravljenje pnevmotoraksa; Regionalna anestezija; Ultrazvočni pregled ledvic; Kateterizacija desnega prekata srca; Kirurško obvladovanje dihalne poti; Šivanje; Torakocenteza; Vstavitev torakalnega katetra; Traheostomija; Transvenozna stimulacija; Torakostomija s cevko; Ultrazvok; Ultrazvočno vodena kateterizacija; Žilni dostop; Venski dostop; Venska kanilacija; Test eFAST; Drugo
th: ขั้นตอน: การตรวจหลอดเลือดแดงใหญ่ในช่องท้องโป่งพอง; การจัดการทางเดินหายใจ; การเข้าถึงหลอดเลือดแดง; การตรวจวิเคราะห์ก๊าซในเลือดแดง; การใส่สายสวนหลอดเลือดแดง; การใส่สายสวนหลอดเลือดแดง; การเจาะน้ำในข้อ; ทักษะการผ่าตัดแบบเปิดขั้นพื้นฐาน; การควบคุมการตกเลือด; การตรวจเต้านมด้วยเครื่องมือ; การใส่สายสวน; เหตุการณ์รุนแรง; การใส่สายสวนหลอดเลือดดำส่วนกลาง; การใส่สายสวนหลอดเลือดส่วนกลาง; การใส่สายระบายทรวงอก; การใส่ท่อระบายทรวงอก; การสำรวจท่อน้ำดีส่วนกลาง; การผ่าตัดกระดูกอ่อนไครโคไทรอยด์; การเจาะกระดูกอ่อนไครโคไธโร; การเจาะดูดของเหลวในช่องท้องเพื่อวินิจฉัย (DPA); การล้างช่องท้องเพื่อวินิจฉัย (DPL); การตรวจอัลตราซาวด์เพื่อการวินิจฉัย; การตรวจเอโคคาร์ดิโอแกรม; เอพิดูรัล; การผ่าตัดช่องคลอด; การตรวจ FAST; การใส่สายสวนหลอดเลือดดำที่ขาหนีบ; การตรวจอัลตราซาวด์วัตถุแปลกปลอม; การตรวจอัลตราซาวด์ถุงน้ำดี; การซ่อมไส้เลื่อน; การลดปริมาณ IV; การหยิบจับเครื่องมือ; การใส่ท่อระบายระหว่างซี่โครง; การแทงเข็มเข้ากระดูก (IO); การเข้าถึงหลอดเลือดดำ; การใส่ท่อช่วยหายใจ; ไตฉีกขาด; การผ่าตัดนำถุงน้ำดีออกโดยใช้กล้อง; การผ่าตัดเชื่อมถุงน้ำดีกับลำไส้เล็กแบบส่องกล้อง; การหยิบจับเครื่องมือส่องกล้อง; การผ่าตัดนิสเซนแบบส่องกล้อง; ทักษะการผ่าตัดผ่านกล้อง; การเย็บแผลด้วยกล้องส่องตรวจช่องท้อง; การผ่าตัดช่องท้อง; การเจาะน้ำไขสันหลัง; การลดแรงดันด้วยเข็ม; การบล็อกเส้นประสาท; เส้นเลือดแดงใหญ่ฉีกขาด; หลอดเลือดแดงไตที่ถูกบาด; การผ่าตัดถุงน้ำดีแบบเปิด; การผ่าตัดแบบเปิด; เครื่องกระตุ้นหัวใจ; การเจาะสารน้ำจากช่องท้อง; การเจาะระบายของเหลวออกจากเยื่อหุ้มหัวใจ; การซ่อมฝีเย็บ; การจัดการความเจ็บปวดบริเวณส่วนปลาย; สายสวนหลอดเลือดดำส่วนกลางที่สอดจากภายนอก (PICC); การใส่ท่อระบายของเหลวในช่องเยื่อหุ้มปอด; การรักษาภาวะลมรั่วในช่องปอด; การระงับความรู้สึกเฉพาะที่; การตรวจอัลตราซาวด์ไต; การใส่สายสวนหัวใจด้านขวา; ทางเดินหายใจจากการผ่าตัด; การเย็บแผล; การเจาะช่องอก; การใส่สายสวนทรวงอก; การเจาะหลอดลม; การกระตุ้นหัวใจผ่านทางหลอดเลือดดำ; การใส่ท่อระบายทรวงอก; อัลตราซาวด์; การใส่สายสวนโดยใช้เครื่องอัลตราซาวด์นำทาง; การเข้าถึงหลอดเลือด; การเข้าถึงหลอดเลือดดำ; การใส่สายสวนหลอดเลือดดำ; การตรวจ eFAST; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Procedimento: Exame de aneurisma da aorta abdominal; Manejo das vias aéreas; Acesso arterial; Coleta de gasometria arterial; Canulação arterial; Inserção de linha arterial; Artrocentese; Habilidades básicas de cirurgia aberta; Controle de sangramento; Sonda mamária; Canulação; Evento catastrófico; Inserção de cateter venoso central; Cateterização vascular central; Inserção de dreno torácico; Inserção de dreno torácico; Exploração do ducto biliar comum; Cricotireoidotomia; Cricotireotomia; Aspiração peritoneal diagnóstica (DPA); Lavagem peritoneal diagnóstica (DPL); Ultrassonografia diagnóstica; Ecocardiograma; Epidural; Episiotomia; Exame FAST; Inserção de acesso femoral; Exame ultrassonográfico de corpo estranho; Exame ultrassonográfico da vesícula biliar; Reparo de hérnia; Dissecção venosa; Manuseio de instrumentos; Inserção de dreno intercostal; Inserção de agulha intraóssea (IO); Acesso intravenoso; Intubação; Rim lacerado; Colecistectomia laparoscópica; Colecistenterostomia laparoscópica; Manuseio de instrumentos laparoscópicos; Procedimento de Nissen laparoscópico; Habilidades laparoscópicas; Sutura laparoscópica; Laparotomia; Punção lombar; Descompressão com agulha; Bloqueio nervoso; Aorta lesionada; Artéria renal lesionada; Colecistectomia aberta; Cirurgia aberta; Gerador de marcapasso; Paracentese; Pericardiocentese; Reparo perineal; Manejo da dor periférica; Cateter central de inserção periférica (PICC); Inserção de dreno pleural; Tratamento de pneumotórax; Anestesia regional; Exame ultrassonográfico renal; Cateterismo cardíaco direito; Via aérea cirúrgica; Sutura; Toracocentese; Inserção de cateter torácico; Traqueostomia; Marcapasso transvenoso; Toracostomia com tubo; Ultrassonografia; Cateterização guiada por ultrassom; Acesso vascular; Acesso venoso; Canulação venosa; Exame eFAST; Outro
ro-RO: Procedură: Examinare pentru anevrism de aortă abdominală; Asigurarea și controlul căilor aeriene; Acces arterial; Prelevarea de gaze din sângele arterial; Cateterizare arterială; Montare de cateter arterial; Artrocenteză; Abilități chirurgicale de bază pentru chirurgie deschisă; Controlul sângerării; Sondă mamară; Cateterizare; Eveniment catastrofal; Montare cateter central; Cateterizare vasculară centrală; Inserție dren toracic; Inserție dren toracic; Explorare a canalului biliar comun; Cricotiroidotomie; Cricotirotomie; Aspirație peritoneală diagnostică (APD); Lavaj peritoneal în scop de diagnostic (DPL); Ecografie în scop de diagnostic; Ecocardiogramă; Anestezie epidurală; Epiziotomie; Examen FAST; Montare cateter femural; Examen ecografic pentru corp străin; Examen ecografic al vezicii biliare; Hernioplastie; Secționare venoasă pentru acces IV; Mânuirea instrumentarului; Inserție dren intercostal; Inserție de ac intraosos; Acces intravenos; Intubație; Rinichi lacerat; Colecistectomie laparoscopică; Colecistenterostomie laparoscopică; Mânuirea instrumentelor laparoscopice; Nissen laparoscopic; Abilități laparoscopice; Sutura laparoscopică; Laparotomie; Puncție lombară; Decompresie cu ac; Bloc nervos; Aortă secționată; Arteră renală secționată; Colecistectomie deschisă; Chirurgie deschisă; Generator de pacemaker; Paracenteză; Pericardiocenteză; Repararea perineală; Managementul durerii periferice; Cateter venos central inserat periferic (PICC); Inserție dren pleural; Tratamentul pneumotoraxului; Anestezie regională; Examen ecografic renal; Cateterism cardiac drept; Cale aeriană chirurgicală; Suturare; Toracocenteză; Inserție cateter toracic; Traheostomie; Stimulare transvenoasă; Toracostomie cu tub; Ecografie; Cateterizare ghidată ecografic; Acces vascular; Acces venos; Canularea venoasă; Examinare eFAST; Altele
el: Διαδικασία: Εξέταση ανευρύσματος κοιλιακής αορτής; Διαχείριση αεραγωγών; Αρτηριακή προσπέλαση; Λήψη αρτηριακών αερίων αίματος; Αρτηριακός καθετηριασμός; Τοποθέτηση αρτηριακής γραμμής; Αρθροκέντηση; Βασικές δεξιότητες ανοικτής χειρουργικής; Έλεγχος αιμορραγίας; Υπερηχογράφημα μαστού; Καθετηριασμός; Καταστροφικό συμβάν; Τοποθέτηση κεντρικής φλεβικής γραμμής; Κεντρικός φλεβικός καθετηριασμός; Τοποθέτηση θωρακικής παροχέτευσης; Τοποθέτηση θωρακικού σωλήνα; Διερεύνηση κοινού χοληδόχου πόρου; Κρικοθυρεοειδοτομή; Κρικοθυρεοτομή; Διαγνωστική περιτοναϊκή παρακέντηση (DPA); Διαγνωστική περιτοναϊκή πλύση (DPL); Διαγνωστικό υπερηχογράφημα; Ηχοκαρδιογράφημα; Επισκληρίδιος; Περινεοτομή; Υπερηχογραφικός έλεγχος FAST; Τοποθέτηση μηριαίας φλεβικής γραμμής; Υπερηχογράφημα ξένου σώματος; Υπερηχογράφημα χοληδόχου κύστης; Αποκατάσταση κήλης; Χειρουργική παρασκευή φλέβας (venous cutdown); Χειρισμός χειρουργικών εργαλείων; Τοποθέτηση μεσοπλεύριας παροχέτευσης; Τοποθέτηση ενδοοστικής (IO) βελόνας; Ενδοφλέβια προσπέλαση; Διασωλήνωση; Ρήξη νεφρού; Λαπαροσκοπική χολοκυστεκτομή; Λαπαροσκοπική χολοκυστοεντεροστομία; Χειρισμός λαπαροσκοπικών εργαλείων; Λαπαροσκοπική θολοπλαστική Nissen; Δεξιότητες λαπαροσκοπικής χειρουργικής; Λαπαροσκοπική συρραφή; Λαπαροτομία; Οσφυονωτιαία παρακέντηση; Αποσυμπίεση με βελόνα; Νευρικός αποκλεισμός; Τρώση αορτής; Τρώση νεφρικής αρτηρίας; Ανοικτή χολοκυστεκτομή; Ανοικτή χειρουργική; Γεννήτρια βηματοδότη; Παρακέντηση; Περικαρδιοκέντηση; Αποκατάσταση περινέου; Διαχείριση περιφερικού πόνου; Κεντρικός φλεβικός καθετήρας περιφερικής εισαγωγής (PICC); Τοποθέτηση υπεζωκοτικής παροχέτευσης; Αντιμετώπιση πνευμοθώρακα; Περιοχική αναισθησία; Υπερηχογράφημα νεφρών; Δεξιός καρδιακός καθετηριασμός; Χειρουργικός αεραγωγός; Συρραφή; Θωρακοκέντηση; Τοποθέτηση θωρακικού καθετήρα; Τραχειοστομία; Διαφλεβική βηματοδότηση; Θωρακική παροχέτευση με σωλήνα; Υπερηχογράφημα; Υπερηχογραφικά καθοδηγούμενος καθετηριασμός; Αγγειακή προσπέλαση; Φλεβική προσπέλαση; Φλεβική καθετηριασμός; Υπερηχογραφικός έλεγχος eFAST; Λοιπά
zh-TW: 程序: 腹主動脈瘤檢查; 呼吸道處置; 動脈通路建立; 動脈血液氣體採樣; 動脈插管; 動脈導管置入; 關節穿刺術; 基礎開放式手術技能; 止血控制; 乳房探查; 插管; 災難性事件; 中心靜脈導管置入; 中心血管導管置入; 胸腔引流管置入術; 胸管置入; 膽總管探查; 環甲膜切開術; 環甲膜切開術; 診斷性腹膜抽吸術 (DPA); 診斷性腹膜灌洗術 (DPL); 診斷性超音波; 心臟超音波; 硬脊膜外麻醉; 會陰切開術; 重點式外傷超音波檢查; 股靜脈導管置入術; 異物超音波檢查; 膽囊超音波檢查; 疝氣修補術; 靜脈切開術; 儀器處理; 肋間引流管置入術; 骨內針置入; 靜脈通路建立; 插管; 腎臟撕裂傷; 腹腔鏡膽囊切除術; 腹腔鏡膽囊小腸吻合術; 腹腔鏡儀器處理; 腹腔鏡胃底摺疊術; 腹腔鏡技能; 腹腔鏡縫合; 剖腹手術; 腰椎穿刺; 針刺減壓; 神經阻斷; 主動脈損傷; 腎動脈損傷; 開放式膽囊切除術; 開放式手術; 心律調節器; 腹腔穿刺術; 心包膜穿刺術; 會陰修補術; 周邊疼痛管理; 周邊置入中心靜脈導管 (PICC); 胸膜腔引流管置入術; 氣胸治療; 區域麻醉; 腎臟超音波檢查; 右心導管插入術; 外科建立呼吸道; 縫合; 胸腔穿刺術; 胸腔導管置入術; 氣管切開術; 經靜脈心律調節器; 導管胸廓造口術; 超音波; 超音波導引導管置入術; 血管通路建立; 靜脈通路建立; 靜脈插管; 延伸重點式外傷超音波檢查; 其他
ja: 手順: 腹部大動脈瘤検査; 気道管理; 動脈アクセス; 動脈血ガス採取; 動脈カニューレ挿入; 動脈ライン留置; 関節穿刺; 開放手術の基本スキル; 出血コントロール; 乳房プローブ; カニューレ挿入; 壊滅的事象; 中心静脈ライン留置; 中心静脈カテーテル挿入; 胸腔ドレーン挿入; 胸腔チューブ挿入; 総胆管探査; 輪状甲状間膜切開術; 輪状甲状間膜切開術; 診断的腹膜穿刺 (DPA); 診断的腹膜洗浄 (DPL); 診断用超音波検査; 心エコー検査; 硬膜外麻酔; 会陰切開; FAST試験; 大腿静脈ライン留置; 異物超音波検査; 胆嚢超音波検査; ヘルニア修復; 静脈切開; 器具操作; 肋間ドレーン挿入; 骨内 (IO) 針挿入; 静脈アクセス; 挿管; 腎臓裂傷; 腹腔鏡下胆嚢摘出術; 腹腔鏡下胆嚢摘出術; 腹腔鏡器具操作; 腹腔鏡下ニッセン; 腹腔鏡スキル; 腹腔鏡下縫合; 開腹手術; 腰椎穿刺; 針減圧; 神経ブロック; 大動脈損傷; 腎動脈損傷; 開腹胆嚢摘出術; 開腹手術; ペーシングジェネレータ; 腹腔穿刺; 心嚢穿刺; 会陰修復; 末梢性疼痛管理; 末梢挿入型中心静脈カテーテル (PICC); 胸膜ドレーン挿入; 気胸治療; 局所麻酔; 腎臓超音波検査; 右心カテーテル挿入; 外科的気道; 縫合; 胸腔穿刺; 胸部カテーテル挿入; 気管切開; 経静脈ペーシング; チューブ胸腔ドレナージ; 超音波; 超音波ガイド下カテーテル挿入; 血管アクセス; 静脈アクセス; 静脈カニューレ挿入; eFAST検査; その他
ru: Процедура: Диагностика аневризмы брюшной аорты; Обеспечение проходимости дыхательных путей; Артериальный доступ; Забор артериальной крови для анализа газового состава; Катетеризация артерии; Установка артериальной линии; Пункция сустава; Базовые навыки открытой хирургии; Остановка кровотечения; Исследование и биопсия молочной железы; Катетеризация; Помощь при жизнеугрожающих состояниях; Постановка центрального венозного катетера; Катетеризация центральных вен; Дренирование грудной клетки; Установка плевральной трубки; Ревизия общего желчного протока; Коникотомия (хирургическая); Коникотомия (пункционная); Диагностическая аспирация брюшной полости; Диагностический перитонеальный лаваж; Ультразвуковая диагностика; Эхокардиография; Эпидуральная анестезия; Эпизиотомия; Оценка травмы по протоколу FAST; Постановка бедренного катетера; Ультразвуковая локализация инородных тел; УЗИ желчного пузыря; Грыжесечение; Венесекция; Техника работы с инструментами; Установка межреберного дренажа; Внутрикостный доступ; Внутривенный доступ; Интубация; Разрыв почки; Лапароскопическая холецистэктомия; Лапароскопическая холецистоэнтеростомия; Техника работы с лапароскопическими инструментами; Лапароскопическая фундопликация по Ниссену; Лапароскопические навыки; Наложение лапароскопических швов; Лапаротомия; Люмбальная пункция; Игольная декомпрессия; Блокада нерва; Повреждение аорты; Повреждение почечной артерии; Открытая холецистэктомия; Открытая хирургическая операция; Электрокардиостимулятор; Парацентез; Перикардиоцентез; Ушивание разрывов промежности; Лечение периферической боли; Периферически имплантируемый центральный венозный катетер; Установка плеврального дренажа; Помощь при пневмотораксе; Регионарная анестезия; УЗИ почек; Катетеризация правых отделов сердца; Хирургическое обеспечение проходимости дыхательных путей; Наложение швов; Плевральная пункция; Установка плеврального катетера; Трахеостомия; Трансвенозная кардиостимуляция; Торакостомия с дренированием; Ультразвуковое исследование; Катетеризация под контролем УЗИ; Сосудистый доступ; Венозный доступ; Катетеризация вены; Оценка травмы по протоколу eFAST; Другое
fi: Toimenpide: Vatsa-aortan aneurysman tutkimus; Hengitysteiden hallinta; Valtimoyhteys; Valtimoveren kaasunäytteenotto; Valtimokanylointi; Valtimolinjan sijoittelu; Niveltulehdus; Basic Shopify avoin kirurginen Taito; Verenvuodon hallinta; Rinta-anturi; Kanylointi; Katastrofaalinen tapahtuma; Keskuslaskimokatetrin asettamispaikka; Keskusverisuonten katetrointi; Keskuslaskimokatetrin asettaminen; Rintaputken asettaminen; Yhteisen sappitiehyen tutkimus; Krikotireidotomia; Krikotireotomia; Diagnostinen peritoneaalinen aspiraatio (DPA); Diagnostinen vatsakalvon huuhtelu (DPL); Diagnostinen ultraääni; Sydämen kaikukuvaus; Epiduraali; Episiotomia; FAST-testi; Reisiluukatetrin asettaminen; Vierasesineen ultraäänitutkimus; Sappirakon ultraäänitutkimus; Tyrän korjaus; IV-leikkaukset; Instrumenttien käsittely; Kylkiluiden välisen dreenin asettaminen; Neulan asettaminen luuhun (IO); Suonensisäinen pääsy; Intubaatio; Repeytynyt munuainen; Laparoskooppinen kolekystektomia; Laparoskooppinen kolekystinterostomia; Laparoskooppisten instrumenttien käsittely; Laparoskooppinen nissen; Laparoskooppinen taito; Laparoskooppinen ompelu; Laparotomia; Lumbaalipunktio; Neulan dekompressio; Hermolohko; Lovitettu aortta; Lovitettu munuaisvaltimo; Avoin kolekystektomia; Avoin leikkaus; Tahdistusgeneraattori; Parasenteesi; Perikardiosenteesi; Välilihan korjaus; Perifeerisen kivun hallinta; Perifeerisesti asetettu keskuskatetri (PICC); Pleuraalisen dreenin asettaminen; Ilmarinnan hoito; Alueellinen anestesia; Munuaisten ultraäänitutkimus; Sydämen oikean puolen katetrointi; Kirurginen hengitystie; Ompeleminen; Torakosenteesi; Rintakehän katetrin asettaminen; Trakeostomia; Transvenoosi tahdistus; Putken torakostomia; Ultraääni; Ultraääniohjattu katetrointi; Verisuoniyhteys; Laskimoyhteys; Laskimokanylointi; eFAST-koe; Muu
sk-SK: Zákrok: Vyšetrenie aneuryzmy brušnej aorty; Manažment dýchacích ciest; Arteriálny prístup; Odber vzoriek arteriálnych krvných plynov; Arteriálna kanylácia; Umiestnenie arteriálneho katétra; Artrocentéza; Základné otvorené chirurgické zručnosti; Kontrola krvácania; Prsná sonda; Kanylácia; Katastrofická udalosť; Zavedenie centrálneho venózneho katétra; Centrálna cievna katetrizácia; Zavedenie hrudného drénu; Zavedenie hrudnej trubice; Prieskum spoločného žlčovodu; Krikotyreoidotomia; Krikotyrotómia; Diagnostická peritoneálna aspirácia (DPA); Diagnostická peritoneálna laváž (DPL); Diagnostický ultrazvuk; Echokardiogram; Epidurálna anestézia; Epiziotómia; RÝCHLA skúška; Zavedenie femorálneho venózneho katétra; Ultrazvukové vyšetrenie cudzieho telesa; Ultrazvukové vyšetrenie žlčníka; Oprava hernie; IV zníženie; Manipulácia s nástrojmi; Zavedenie medzirebrového drénu; Intraoseálne (IO) zavedenie ihly; Intravenózny prístup; Intubácia; Trhlina v obličke; Laparoskopická cholecystektómia; Laparoskopická cholecystenterostómia; Manipulácia s laparoskopickými nástrojmi; Laparoskopický nissen; Laparoskopické zručnosti; Laparoskopické šitie; Laparotómia; Lumbálna punkcia; Dekompresia ihlou; Nervový blok; Prerezaná aorta; Prerezávaná renálna artéria; Otvorená cholecystektómia; Otvorená operácia; Generátor stimulácie; Paracentéza; Perikardiocentéza; Oprava hrádze; Manažment periférnej bolesti; Periférne zavedený centrálny katéter (PICC); Zavedenie pleurálneho drénu; Liečba pneumotoraxu; Regionálna anestézia; Ultrazvukové vyšetrenie obličiek; Katetrizácia pravého srdca; Chirurgické dýchacie cesty; Šitie; Torakocentéza; Zavedenie hrudného katétra; Tracheostómia; Transvenózna stimulácia; Torakostómia s trubicou; Ultrazvuk; Ultrazvukom riadená katetrizácia; Cievny prístup; Venózny prístup; Venózna kanylácia; Ultrazvukové vyšetrenie eFAST; Iný
da: Procedure: Undersøgelse af abdominal aorta aneurisme; Luftvejshåndtering; Arteriel adgang; Arteriel blodgasprøvetagning; Arteriel kanylering; Placering af arteriel linje; Arthrocentese; Grundlæggende færdigheder i forbindelse med åben kirurgi; Blødningskontrol; Brystsonde; Kanylering; Katastrofal begivenhed; Anlæggelse af centralt venekateter; Central vaskulær kateterisering; Anlæggelse af thoraxdræn; Indsættelse af thoraxslange; Undersøgelse af den fælles galdegang; Cricothyroidotomi; Krikothyrotomi; Diagnostisk peritoneal aspiration (DPA); Diagnostisk peritoneal lavage (DPL); Diagnostisk ultralyd; Ekkokardiogram; Epidural; Episiotomi; FAST-undersøgelse; Anlæggelse af femoraliskateter; Ultralydsundersøgelse af fremmedlegeme; Ultralydsundersøgelse af galdeblære; Herniereparation; IV-nedskæring; Instrumenthåndtering; Indsættelse af interkostal dræn; Intraossøs (IO) nåleindsættelse; Intravenøs adgang; Intubation; Flænset nyre; Laparoskopisk kolecystektomi; Laparoskopisk kolecystenterostomi; Laparoskopisk instrumenthåndtering; Laparoskopisk nissen; Laparoskopisk færdighed; Laparoskopisk suturering; Laparotomi; Lumbalpunktur; Nåledekompression; Nerveblokade; Rift i aorta; Rift i nyrearterie; Åben kolecystektomi; Åben kirurgi; Pacinggenerator; Paracentese; Perikardiocentese; Reparation af perinealområdet; Perifer smertebehandling; Perifert indsat centralt kateter (PICC); Indsættelse af pleuradræn; Behandling af pneumothorax; Regionalbedøvelse; Nyreultralydsundersøgelse; Hjertekateterisation i højre side; Kirurgisk luftvej; Suturering; Thoracentese; Anlæggelse af thoraxkateter; Trakeostomi; Transvenøs pacing; Rørthorakostomi; Ultralyd; Ultralydvejledt kateterisation; Vaskulær adgang; Venøs adgang; Venøs kanylering; eFAST-undersøgelse; Andet